Utah statutes.
76-3-105.   Infractions.
(1) Infractions are not classified.
(2)  Any offense which is an infraction within this code is expressly
designated and any offense defined outside this code which is not designated
as a felony or misdemeanor and for which no penalty is specified is an
infraction.
